Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF758.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2362HV (1) 91 th/ns H.F. 758 Section 1. Section 322.19A, subsections 1, 2, and 3, Code 1 2025, are amended to read as follows: 2 1. For purposes of this section , âdocumentary feeâ 3 âadministrative feeâ means a fee that may be charged to 4 a customer by a motor vehicle dealer for the preparation 5 of documents related to an application for motor vehicle 6 registration and an application for issuance of a certificate 7 of title, and the performance of other related performing 8 services for , related to the sale of a motor vehicle, on behalf 9 of the customer. âDocumentary feeâ âAdministrative feeâ does 10 not include any costs or fees charged to a motor vehicle dealer 11 or a dealerâs customer by a third party. 12 2. A motor vehicle dealer may charge a documentary an 13 administrative fee not to exceed one hundred eighty dollars for 14 each motor vehicle sold in a transaction. 15 3. A motor vehicle dealer who charges a documentary an 16 administrative fee to a customer shall include the fee in the 17 price of the motor vehicle. The dealer shall disclose the full 18 amount of the fee in any price of a motor vehicle advertised 19 by the dealer and when making or accepting an offer to sell 20 a motor vehicle. The dealer shall provide the following 21 notice to the customer, which notice shall be clearly and 22 conspicuously disclosed in any motor vehicle purchase agreement 23 with the customer: 24 DOCUMENTARY ADMINISTRATIVE FEE. A DOCUMENTARY AN 25 ADMINISTRATIVE FEE IS NOT AN OFFICIAL FEE. A DOCUMENTARY AN 26 ADMINISTRATIVE FEE IS NOT REQUIRED BY LAW, BUT MAY BE CHARGED 27 TO A BUYER CUSTOMER FOR THE PREPARATION OF DOCUMENTS AND THE 28 PERFORMANCE OF RELATED PERFORMING SERVICES , RELATED TO THE SALE 29 OF A MOTOR VEHICLE, ON BEHALF OF THE CUSTOMER . THE MAXIMUM 30 AMOUNT THAT MAY BE CHARGED FOR A DOCUMENTARY FEE IS DETERMINED 31 BY IOWA CODE SECTION 322.19A . THIS NOTICE IS REQUIRED BY LAW. 32